Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.09.010

Amendment of charter—Initiated by legislative body.

The charter of a charter code city may be amended by proposals therefor submitted by resolution of the legislative authority of such city to the electors thereof at any general election, after publication of such proposed charter amendment in the manner provided in chapter 35A.08 RCW for publication of a proposed charter, and upon notice of election as provided by law. If such proposed charter amendment is ratified by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon it shall become a part of the charter organic law governing such charter code city.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.09.010.]